Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.015

Productivity board created—Also known as employee involvement and recognition board—Members—Terms—Compensation.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, there is hereby created the productivity board, which may also be known as the employee involvement and recognition board. The board shall administer the employee suggestion program and the teamwork incentive program under this chapter.

(2) The board shall be composed of:

(a) The secretary of state who shall act as chairperson;

(b) The director of financial management or the director's designee;

(c) The director of enterprise services or the director's designee;

(d) Three persons with experience in administering incentives such as those used by industry, with the lieutenant governor, secretary of state, and speaker of the house of representatives each appointing one person by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. The secretary of state's appointee shall be a representative of an employee organization certified as an exclusive representative of at least one bargaining unit of classified employees; and

(e) Two persons representing state agencies and institutions with employees subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, and one person representing those subject to *chapter 28B.16 RCW, both appointed by the secretary of state by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable.

Members under subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this section shall be appointed to serve three-year terms.

Members of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section may be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Any board member who is not a state employee may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2023 c 106 s 1. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 443; 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 30; 2000 c 139 s 1; 1999 c 50 s 2; 1993 c 467 s 2; 1987 c 387 s 2; 1985 c 114 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 72; 1983 c 54 s 2; 1982 c 167 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 28B.16 RCW was repealed by 1993 c 281, with the exception of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.16.240, which was recodified as RCW 41.06.382. For exemptions to higher education personnel law see chapter 41.06 RCW. RCW 28B.16.015 and 41.06.382 were subsequently repealed by 2002 c 354 s 403, effective July 1, 2005.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.

Effective date—1985 c 114: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1985." [ 1985 c 114 s 8.]

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—1982 c 167: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 167 s 18.]